Tennessee, session 114, HB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 9, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
55-9-411.
(a) A person or entity who installs tires on a passenger motor vehicle or truck
less than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) that are larger in total diameter than the
original equipment manufacturer's tires installed when the vehicle or truck was
manufactured and that are installed in accordance with § 55-9-215(g) shall properly
adjust the headlights in accordance with the original equipment manufacturer's
established specifications and allowable tolerances for the particular model and year. If
the person or entity is engaged in the business of installing tires, whether as the principal
business of the person or entity or incidental to the person or entity's principal business,
then the person shall also charge a person for the adjustment of a vehicle's headlights.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor, subject only to
imposition of a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-9-215, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g)
(1) A person or entity shall not install tires on a passenger motor vehicle
or truck less than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) that are larger in total
HB1272
001849
- 1 -

diameter than the original equipment manufacturer's tires installed when the
vehicle or truck was manufactured so as to cause the bumper to violate
subdivision (b)(1) or to cause the frame to violate subdivision (b)(4)(A).
(2) A violation of subdivision (g)(1) is a Class B misdemeanor, subject
only to imposition of a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001849